Utah statutes.
11-36a-703.   Procedures for challenging an impact fee.

(1) (a)  A local political subdivision may establish, by ordinance or resolution, an administrative appeals procedure to consider and decide a challenge to an impact fee.

(b)  If the local political subdivision establishes an administrative appeals procedure, the local political subdivision shall ensure that the procedure includes a requirement that the local political subdivision make its decision no later than 30 days after the day on which the challenge to the impact fee is filed.

(2)  A challenge under Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(a) is initiated by filing:

(a)  if the local political subdivision has established an administrative appeals procedure under Subsection (1), the necessary document, under the administrative appeals procedure, for initiating the administrative appeal;

(b)  a request for arbitration as provided in Section 11-36a-705; or

(c)  an action in district court.

(3)  The sole remedy for a successful challenge under Subsection 11-36a-701(1), which determines that an impact fee process was invalid, or an impact fee is in excess of the fee allowed under this act, is a declaration that, until the local political subdivision or private entity enacts a new impact fee study, from the date of the decision forward, the entity may charge an impact fee only as the court has determined would have been appropriate if it had been properly enacted.

(4)  Subsections (2), (3), 11-36a-701(3), and 11-36a-702(1) may not be construed as requiring a person or an entity to exhaust administrative remedies with the local political subdivision before filing an action in district court under Subsections (2), (3), 11-36a-701(3), and 11-36a-702(1).

(5)  The judge may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party in an action brought under this section.

(6)  This chapter may not be construed as restricting or limiting any rights to challenge impact fees that were paid before the effective date of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

